Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 26 Improvements to Ten Mile River

46-26-1.
Improvements to Ten Mile River.

The state of Rhode Island or any of its municipalities are hereby authorized to negotiate and enter into agreements with the Commonwealth of Massachusetts or any of its municipalities concerning improvements to the Ten Mile River.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 430, § 1.

46-26-2.
Agreements with Massachusetts.

The state of Rhode Island or any of its municipalities are further authorized to negotiate and enter into agreements with the Commonwealth of Massachusetts or any of its municipalities to:

Maintain, and improve the Ten Mile River located within or without either state or commonwealth,

Provide for the financing thereof with any federal funds made available through the Housing and Community Development Act of 1980, 12 U.S.C. § 1701q et seq., or any other federal funds from any other source, and if Rhode Island is delegated the recipient of those funds, then they shall be administered through the department of administration or any agency, authority, or division so designated by the department of administration,

Have the authority to accept funds from the Commonwealth of Massachusetts or any of its municipalities if the commonwealth is the recipient of the federal funds, and

Provide for any and all other matters which may, in the state’s or its municipalities’ discretion, be necessary or desirable to carry out any such agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 430, § 1.

46-26-3.
Town council approval.

Any agreement, executed by a Rhode Island municipality pursuant to §

46-26-2

and this section, must be approved by the town council before the agreements can become effective.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 430, § 1.